Georgia, session 2025_26, HB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:
(1) The colorful history and traditions of the State of Georgia are inextricably associated
with the food traditions of root vegetables and greens, which are chock-full of vitamins
and minerals that are healthy for us, and among the many legacies of this proud heritage
is the delicious dish and its liquid, a dipping sauce known as collard greens with
"potlikka";
(2) Collard greens' "potlikka" serves as an especially excellent dipping sauce for all
manner of breads;
H. B. 65
- 1 -

LC 44 2911
(3) During the holidays, tens of thousands of Georgians especially enjoy dipping
cornbread, the official Georgia state bread, in their collard greens with "potlikka";
(4) Collard greens with "potlikka" enjoy a singular stature in Georgia history and culture
that is rivaled only by its undeniable appeal as a unique and satisfying food. Establishing
collard greens as the official Georgia state greens and "potlikka" as the official Georgia
state dipping sauce of the official Georgia state bread is necessary to fully recognize the
importance of this product to this state; and
(5) The State of Georgia is the second highest producer in the country of collards, with
almost 20 percent of the state's farmed acreage and almost 30,000 acres devoted to the
crop.
SECTION 2.
Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to other
state symbols, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"50-3-94.
Collard greens are designated as the official Georgia state greens, and 'potlikka' is
designated as the official Georgia state dipping sauce of the official Georgia state bread."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, only if an Act to provide for the designation
of cornbread as the official Georgia state bread becomes effective on or before July 1, 2025.
If such an Act does not become law, then this Act shall not become effective and shall stand
repealed on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 65
- 2 -